Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1579.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 419B.016 is amended to read:
419B.016. (1) As used in this section, “child abuse” means “abuse” as defined in ORS
419B.005.
[(1)] (2) A person commits the [offense] crime of making a false report of child abuse if, with the
intent to influence a custody, parenting time, visitation or child support decision, the person:
(a) Makes a false report of child abuse to the Department of Human Services or a law enforce-
ment agency, knowing that the report is false; or
(b) With the intent that a public or private official make a report of child abuse to the Depart-
ment of Human Services or a law enforcement agency, makes a false report of child abuse to the
public or private official, knowing that the report is false.
[(2) Making a false report of child abuse is a Class A violation.]
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection, making a false report
of child abuse is a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) Making a false report of child abuse is a Class A misdemeanor if the person has one
prior conviction under this section at the time of the offense.
(c) Making a false report of child abuse is a Class C felony if the person has two or more
prior convictions under this section at the time of the offense.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 419B.016 by section 1 of this 2026 Act apply to:
(1) False reports of child abuse made on or after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
(2) For purposes of ORS 419B.016 (3)(b) and (c), prior convictions occurring before, on or
after the effective date of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 78

SB 1579

[2]